Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-812
Bonds and coupons; negotiability; sale; price.

(1) Except as the issuing joint entity's governing body may otherwise provide, any bond and any interest coupons thereto attached shall be fully negotiable within the meaning of and for all purposes of article 8, Uniform Commercial Code.

(2) The bonds may be sold at public or private sale as the issuing joint entity's governing body may provide and at such price or prices as such governing body shall determine.

Laws 1991, LB 731, § 12.